Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1551.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 253(b) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 253. Refund Petition.--* * *(b) (1) A refund or credit of tax, interest or penalty, paid as a result of an assessment made by the department under section 231, shall be made only where the person who has actually paid the tax files with the department a petition for a refund with the department under Article XXVII within the time limits of section 3003.1. The filing of a petition for refund, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 under the provisions of this subsection, shall not affect the abatement of interest, additions or penalties to which the person may be entitled by reason of his payment of the assessment.(2) In addition to the information required under Article XXVII, a petition for refund filed under this section shall include the following information:(A) The specific basis of the taxpayer's claim for refund. (B) An appeal schedule in a manner or form as required by the department. If the petition involves two hundred fifty or more transactions, the appeal schedule shall be in a detailed electronic sortable spreadsheet listing all of the transactions at issue.(C) Proof the tax for which a petition for refund is filed was actually paid.(D) Any evidence in a manner or form required by the department to support the information required in this paragraph.(3) If a petition for refund filed under this section does not include all of the information required in paragraph (2), the department may require the taxpayer to provide the information within thirty days of the receipt of the petition. Upon the failure of the taxpayer to provide the information under this section within thirty days of filing, the department may dismiss the petition with prejudice.(4) If a petition for refund filed under this section involves two hundred fifty or more transactions, the taxpayer shall provide all evidence in an electronic format.(5) Each petition for refund filed under this section shall not include the same tax periods that were included in another 20250HB1551PN1855 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 petition filed by the same taxpayer.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1551PN1855 - 3 - 12